Alaska, session 34, HB238.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF ALASKA: 04 * Section 1. AS 18.09.990(7) is amended to read: 05 (7) "included vaccine" means a vaccine recommended by the Advisory 06 Committee on Immunization Practices of the Centers for Disease Control and 07 Prevention, United States Department of Health and Human Services, or for children 08 and adolescents 18 years of age or younger, a vaccine recommended by the 09 American Academy of Pediatrics, and included on a list maintained by the 10 commissioner for inclusion in the program; 11 * Sec. 2. AS 47.07.030(b) is amended to read: 12 (b) In addition to the mandatory services specified in (a) of this section and the 13 services provided under (d) of this section, the department may offer only the 14 following optional services: case management services for traumatic or acquired brain 01 injury; case management and nutrition services for pregnant women; personal care 02 services in a recipient's home; emergency hospital services; long-term care 03 noninstitutional services; medical supplies and equipment; advanced practice 04 registered nurse services; clinic services; rehabilitative services for children eligible 05 for services under AS 47.07.063, substance abusers, and emotionally disturbed or 06 chronically mentally ill adults; targeted case management services; inpatient 07 psychiatric facility services for individuals 65 years of age or older and individuals 08 under 21 years of age; psychologists' services; clinical social workers' services; marital 09 and family therapy services; professional counseling services; midwife services; 10 prescribed drugs; physical therapy; occupational therapy; chiropractic services; low- 11 dose mammography screening, as defined in AS 21.42.375(e); hospice care; treatment 12 of speech, hearing, and language disorders; adult dental and dental hygiene services; 13 prosthetic devices and eyeglasses; optometrists' services; intermediate care facility 14 services, including intermediate care facility services for persons with intellectual and 15 developmental disabilities; skilled nursing facility services for individuals under 21 16 years of age; immunizations recommended by the American Academy of 17 Pediatrics for children and adolescents 18 years of age or younger; and reasonable 18 transportation to and from the point of medical care. Welcome toThe Alaska State Legislature This web site is the place to track bills, locate and contact your legislators, and access committee information. Questions? Try our help wizard or call 907-465-4648. SMS Bill Tracking Text a bill number (ex: HB1) to 559-245-2529 to enroll in text alerts. You will receive an enrollment confirmation and instructions on how to stop receiving the alerts.